Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 1. Establishment; Jurisdiction; etc.
§ 17.1-512.
Election of successor judge before date of vacancy.

Whenever a vacancy occurs or exists in the office of a judge of a circuit while the General Assembly is in session, or whenever the term of office of a judge of a circuit court will expire or the office will be vacated at a date certain between the adjournment of the General Assembly and the commencement of the next session of the General Assembly, a successor judge may be elected at any time during a session preceding the date of such vacancy, by the vote of a majority of the members elected to each house of the General Assembly, for a term of eight years and upon qualification, the successor judge shall enter at once upon the discharge of the duties of his office. However, such successor judge shall not enter upon the discharge of his duties prior to the commencement of his term of office. No person shall be elected or reelected to a subsequent term under this section until he has submitted to a criminal history record search and submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect and reports of such searches have been received by the Chairman of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Chairman of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary on the Judiciary. No person with a criminal conviction for a felony shall be appointed as a judge. If the person has not met the requirement of filing in the preceding calendar year a disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

or 30-111, he shall also provide a written statement of economic interests on the disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

to the Chairman of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Chairman of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary.

History.

1973, c. 544, § 17-122.1; 1993, c. 368; 1998, c. 872; 2004, c. 452; 2018, c. 578.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairman of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Chairman of the
Senate Committee on the Judiciary” for “the chairmen of the House and Senate Committees for Courts of Justice” in two places. March 10, 2021.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 452 added the last two sentences.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 578 substituted “and submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect and reports of such searches have been received” for “and a report of such search has been received” in the third sentence, and added the last sentence.

§ 17.1-513.
Jurisdiction of circuit courts.

The circuit courts shall have jurisdiction of proceedings by quo warranto or information in the nature of quo warranto and to issue writs of mandamus, prohibition and certiorari to all inferior tribunals created or existing under the laws of the Commonwealth, and to issue writs of mandamus in all matters of proceedings arising from or pertaining to the action of the boards of supervisors or other governing bodies of the several counties for which such courts are respectively held or in other cases in which it may be necessary to prevent the failure of justice and in which mandamus may issue according to the principles of common law. They shall have appellate jurisdiction in all cases, civil and criminal, in which an appeal may, as provided by law, be taken from the judgment or proceedings of any inferior tribunal.

They shall have original and general jurisdiction of all civil cases, except cases upon claims to recover personal property or money not of greater value than $100, exclusive of interest, and except such cases as are assigned to some other tribunal; also in all cases for the recovery of fees in excess of $100; penalties or cases involving the right to levy and collect toll or taxes or the validity of an ordinance or bylaw of any corporation; and also, of all cases, civil or criminal, in which an appeal may be had to the Court of Appeals.

They shall have jurisdiction to hear motions filed for the purpose of modifying, dissolving, or extending a protective order pursuant to § 16.1-279.1 or

19.2-152.10

if the circuit court issued such order, unless the circuit court remanded the matter to the jurisdiction of the juvenile and domestic relations district court in accordance with § 16.1-297. They shall also have original jurisdiction of all indictments for felonies and of presentments, informations and indictments for misdemeanors. They shall also have jurisdiction for bail hearings pursuant to §§

19.2-327.2:1

and

19.2-327.10:1

.

Upon certification by the district court of any felony charge and ancillary misdemeanor charge or when an appeal of a conviction of an offense in district court is noted, jurisdiction as to such charges shall vest in the circuit court, unless such case is reopened pursuant to § 16.1-133.1; a final judgment, order, or decree is modified, vacated, or suspended pursuant to Supreme Court of Virginia Rule 1:1; or the appeal has been withdrawn in the district court within 10 days pursuant to § 16.1-133.

They shall have appellate jurisdiction of all cases, civil and criminal, in which an appeal, writ of error or supersedeas may, as provided by law, be taken to or allowed by such courts, or the judges thereof, from or to the judgment or proceedings of any inferior tribunal. They shall also have jurisdiction of all other matters, civil and criminal, made cognizable therein by law and when a motion to recover money is allowed in such tribunals, they may hear and determine the same, although it is to recover less than $100.

While a matter is pending in a circuit court, upon motion of the plaintiff seeking to decrease the amount of the claim to within the exclusive or concurrent jurisdiction of the general district court as described in subdivision 1 of § 16.1-77, the circuit court shall order transfer of the matter to the general district court that has jurisdiction over the amended amount of the claim without requiring that the case first be dismissed or that the plaintiff suffer a nonsuit, and the tolling of the applicable statutes of limitations governing the pending matter shall be unaffected by the transfer. Except for good cause shown, no such order of transfer shall issue unless the motion to amend and transfer is made at least 10 days before trial. The plaintiff shall pay filing and other fees as otherwise provided by law to the clerk of the court to which the case is transferred, and such clerk shall process the claim as if it were a new civil action. The plaintiff shall prepare and present the order of transfer to the transferring court for entry, after which time the case shall be removed from the pending docket of the transferring court and the order of transfer placed among its records. The plaintiff shall provide a certified copy of the transfer order to the receiving court.

History.

Code 1919, § 5890, § 17-123; 1928, p. 1164; 1973, c. 544; 1977, c. 624; 1998, c. 872; 2005, c. 681; 2012, cc. 152, 261; 2015, c. 66; 2020, c. 903; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 187, 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2012, cc. 152 and
261, cl. 2 provides: “That beginning July 1, 2013, any circuit court clerk who does not use the Statewide Case Management System operated and maintained by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court shall provide protective orders directly to the Virginia Criminal Information Network in an electronic format approved by the Department of State Police; and that until July 1, 2013, such clerks shall forthwith forward the protective order to the primary law-enforcement agency providing service and entry of protective orders for entry into the Virginia Criminal Information Network.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 681, effective January 1, 2006, substituted “all civil cases, except cases upon claims to” for “all cases in chancery and civil cases at law, except cases at law to” in the first sentence in the second paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 152 and 261 are identical, and added the present first sentence of the third paragraph, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 66 added the last sentence in the third paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 903 added the last paragraph.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 187, effective July 1, 2021, inserted the fourth paragraph.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, substituted “Court of Appeals” for “Supreme Court” in the second paragraph.

Cross references.

As to writs of mandamus and prohibition, see §§

8.01-644

through

8.01-653.1

.

As to jurisdiction in criminal cases generally, see §

19.2-239

.

Law Review.

For a note on the use of mandamus in judicial proceedings in Virginia, see 40 Va. L. Rev. 817 (1954).

For note, “Obtaining Jurisdiction Over Corporations in Virginia,” see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 369 (1978).

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 301 (1980).

For article, “Appeal De Novo in Virginia: An Examination of Its Present Utility,” see 42 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1149 (1985).

For article, “Civil Rights and ‘Personal Injuries’: Virginia’s Statute of Limitations for Section 1983 Suits,” see 26 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 199 (1985).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

For annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 269 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 357; 3B M.J. Certiorari, § 21; 5A M.J. Courts, § 39; 12B M.J. Mandamus, § 24.

§ 17.1-513.01.
Jurisdiction of circuit courts with respect to charitable assets.

The circuit courts shall have the same subject matter jurisdiction over matters pertaining to assets of charitable corporations, incorporated in or doing any business in Virginia, as the circuit courts have with respect to assets held by unincorporated charitable trusts and other charitable entities, including the power to require accountings, appoint receivers, award damages, and enter injunctive relief against such charitable corporations, their officers, directors, agents, employees and others as may be necessary to protect the public interest in such assets.

Nothing contained in this section is intended to modify the standard of conduct applicable under existing law to the directors of charitable corporations incorporated in or doing any business in Virginia.

History.

2002, c. 792; 2004, c. 289.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 289 inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph; and added subsection B.

Law Review.

For 2002 survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts, and estates, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 357 (2002).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 17 Beneficiaries. § 17.25 Present Status. Cox.

§ 17.1-513.1.
Appeals from administrative proceedings; abuse and neglect; record to be sealed.

In cases appealed to the circuit court involving child abuse and neglect pursuant to §

63.2-1526

, proceedings shall be confidential and the record in the case shall be sealed. However, the court may, for good cause shown, unseal the record.

History.

2000, c. 478.

§ 17.1-513.2.
Use of telephonic communication systems or electronic video and audio communication systems to conduct hearing.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any civil proceeding in which a party or a witness is incarcerated or when otherwise authorized by the court, the court may, in its discretion, conduct any hearing using a telephonic communication system or an electronic audio and video communication system to provide for the appearance of any parties and witnesses. Any electronic audio and video communication system used to conduct such a hearing shall meet the standards set forth in subsection B of §

19.2-3.1

.

History.

2001, c. 513.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

§ 17.1-514.
When plaintiff entitled to less than $100; judgment for defendant.

In any personal action in a circuit court, wherein it is ascertained that less than $100, exclusive of interest, is due to the plaintiff, judgment shall be for the defendant, unless the court enter of record that the matter in controversy was of greater value than $100, exclusive of interest, in which case it may render judgment for the plaintiff for what is ascertained to be due him, with or without costs, in the court’s discretion.

History.

Code 1950, § 8-511.1; 1952, c. 248; 1977, c. 624, § 17-123.1; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-515.
Jurisdiction formerly in county courts.

The jurisdiction and powers which were vested in the county courts and the judges and officers thereof, respectively, on January 31, 1904, by the laws of this Commonwealth or under any will or other instrument of writing shall be vested in, exercised by and imposed upon the circuit courts and the judges and officers thereof, except when otherwise specially provided.

All such acts and proceedings of the circuit courts, judges and officers thereof, respectively, whether de jure or de facto officers, done or had since January 31, 1904, as may hereafter be done under this section, are hereby ratified and made valid.

History.

Code 1919, § 5891, § 17-124; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-515.1.
Territorial jurisdiction of the Circuit Court for the City of Lynchburg.

The territorial jurisdiction of the Circuit Court for the City of Lynchburg shall extend to the corporate limits of the city and to a space of one mile without and around the city limits, except that the same shall not extend further into the County of Amherst than the corporate limits. Any judgment, order, or decree of the Circuit Court for the City of Lynchburg heretofore made in any case in which the court would have had jurisdiction had this section then been in operation shall have the same effect as if it had been at that time in force.

History.

Code 1919, § 5904, § 17-125; 2018, c. 164.

Editor’s note.

Formerly, this section was not set out in the Code of Virginia. At its April 4, 2017, meeting, the Virginia Code Commission approved setting out the full text.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 164 deleted “shall be the same with that of the Corporation Court for the city and” following “City of Lynchburg” in the first sentence.

§ 17.1-515.2.
Repealed by Acts 2018, c. 164, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

17.1-515.2

, pertaining to jurisdiction of circuit and district courts of Henry, Roanoke, Augusta and Rockbridge counties over certain property, derived from 1968, c. 33; 1970, c. 523; 1974, c. 297, § 17-126.2.

§ 17.1-515.3.
Designation of courtrooms within twenty-first and twenty-third circuits for trial of certain cases.

The chief judge of the twenty-first and the twenty-third judicial circuits may, by order, as in the interest of justice may appear, designate one or more of the courtrooms of any circuit court within their respective circuits as the courtroom or courtrooms in which civil and criminal cases whose venue is laid within the circuit may be tried; provided, that in criminal cases, jurors summoned to appear at such courtroom or courtrooms shall reside in the vicinage of which the crime is laid.

History.

1976, c. 272; 1977, c. 195, § 17-126.3.

Editor’s note.

Formerly, this section was not set out in the Code of Virginia. At its April 4, 2017, meeting, the Virginia Code Commission approved setting out the full text.

§ 17.1-515.4.
Designation of certain courtrooms within sixteenth circuit for trial of certain cases.

When it appears to one or more of the judges of the sixteenth judicial circuit that such use is appropriate, the courthouse of the Circuit Court of Albemarle County may be used for the trial of civil or criminal cases whose venue is laid in the City of Charlottesville, or the courthouse of the Circuit Court of the City of Charlottesville may be used for the trial of civil or criminal cases whose venue is laid in the County of Albemarle; provided, that in criminal cases, jurors summoned to appear at any such courtroom shall reside in the vicinage of which the crime is laid.

History.

1978, c. 61, § 17-126.4.

Editor’s note.

Formerly, this section was not set out in the Code of Virginia. At its April 4, 2017, meeting, the Virginia Code Commission approved setting out the full text.

§ 17.1-515.5.
Designation of certain courtrooms within twenty-fifth circuit for trial of certain cases.

When it appears to one or more of the judges of the twenty-fifth judicial circuit that such use is appropriate, the courthouse of the Circuit Court of Augusta County may be used for the trial of civil and criminal cases when venue is laid in the City of Staunton; or the courthouse of the Circuit Court of the City of Staunton may be used for the trial of civil or criminal cases when venue is laid in the County of Augusta. However, jurors summoned to appear in any such courtroom shall reside in the jurisdiction where the venue is laid.

History.

1984, c. 86, § 17-126.5.

Editor’s note.

Formerly, this section was not set out in the Code of Virginia. At its April 4, 2017, meeting, the Virginia Code Commission approved setting out the full text.

§ 17.1-515.6.
Concurrent law-enforcement jurisdiction over Joint Judicial Center in Winchester.

The Frederick County Sheriff’s Department shall have, concurrently with the City of Winchester Police Department, jurisdiction to arrest perpetrators of all offenses committed in or upon the premises, buildings, rooms, or offices of the Joint Judicial Center located in the City of Winchester.

History.

1984, c. 363, § 17-126.6.

Editor’s note.

Formerly, this section was not set out in the Code of Virginia. At its April 4, 2017, meeting, the Virginia Code Commission approved setting out the full text.

§ 17.1-516.
Jurisdiction of courts over certain waters.

Where any river, watercourse, or bay lies between any counties or any cities, or any county and city in this Commonwealth, the circuit courts for the counties and the cities, on each side, respectively, shall have concurrent territorial jurisdiction over so much thereof as shall be opposite to such counties and cities. And the circuit courts for counties and cities lying on the waters bounding the Commonwealth shall have concurrent territorial jurisdiction respectively over such waters opposite such counties and cities, as far as the jurisdiction of this Commonwealth extends. This section shall not apply to the City of Richmond.

History.

Code 1919, § 5958, §

17-1

; 1948, p. 151; 1998, c. 872; 2005, cc. 45, 114.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 45 and 114 are identical, and substituted “City of Richmond” for “Cities of Norfolk and Richmond” at the end of the section.

Law Review.

For note discussing bill adding a chapter providing for a court of appeals, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 209 (1982).

§ 17.1-517.
Number of terms; how fixed.

The chief judge of each circuit shall fix the terms of each of the courts within his circuit; provided, that there shall be at least four terms of court each year, and the dockets for criminal and civil cases may be called on the same or different days in any courtroom of the circuit. Such terms shall be fixed by order, which shall be entered in the common-law order book in each court. The order fixing or changing the terms of court shall be entered on or before January 1, to become effective July 1, and a copy of the order shall be forwarded to the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court, who shall cause an abstract thereof to be published in the Code of Virginia, as a part of the Rules of Court.

History.

1973, c. 544, § 17-127.21; 1976, c. 133; 1998, c. 872.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Courts, §§ 5, 7.

§ 17.1-518.
Special terms; when, how and by whom appointed.

If any term of a circuit court is to end, or has ended, without the dispatch of all its business or if there be a failure to hold any term or it is expedient in the opinion of the judge of the court to hold a special term for the trial of any cause pending in such court or of issues made up in any cause by consent of parties, or if the situation of a person confined in jail for trial in such circuit court makes it proper that his case should be disposed of before the next regular term thereof, or necessity in the judge’s opinion requires it, the judge of such circuit court or, if he is dead or is unable from any cause to hold his court, the judge of any other circuit court who has been designated to hold such terms, may, by order entered in such court or by a warrant directed to the clerk, appoint a special term thereof and prescribe in such order or warrant whether any venire is to be summoned to attend the term. The clerk shall inform the attorney for the Commonwealth and the sheriff of such appointment, post a copy of the warrant or order at the front door of the courthouse and issue all proper process to such special term and the sheriff shall execute the process.

History.

Code 1919, § 5894, § 17-129; 1973, c. 544; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-519.
Adjournment thereof to a future day.

Whenever any judge of a circuit court has appointed a special term of any circuit court, by adjournment or warrant in the manner directed by §

17.1-518

, and shall afterward ascertain that he cannot hold the special term on the day appointed for it, he may, by warrant, directed to the clerk of the court, adjourn it to such other day as he deems proper. The warrant shall be transmitted to the clerk, who shall immediately enter it in the order book of the court and, as to the special term thereafter to be held under the continuance, proceed in all other respects in the manner directed by §

17.1-518

.

History.

Code 1919, § 5895, § 17-130; 1998, c. 872.

Cross references.

For other provisions as to adjournment, see §§

17.1-119

,

17.1-120

.

§ 17.1-520.
What tried at a special term.

At any such special term:

Any civil case may be tried which could lawfully have been but was not tried at the last preceding term that was or should have been held;

Any motion cognizable by such court may be heard and determined, whether it was pending at the preceding term or not;

Any criminal case may be tried at such special term as if it were a regular term, although at the preceding regular term the same may not have been pending in the court or may have been continued; and

Any cause or matter of controversy, then ready for hearing or which may be made ready by consent of parties, may, with the consent of the parties to such cause or controversy, be heard and determined, although it could not lawfully have been heard at the preceding term that was or should have been held.

History.

Code 1919, § 5896, § 17-131; 1998, c. 872; 2005, c. 681.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 681, effective January 1, 2006, deleted “for a judgment or other motion” preceding “cognizable” in subdivision 2; and deleted “at law or in chancery” following “controversy” in subdivision 4.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Injunctions, § 114.

§ 17.1-521.
Who to hold special term; powers.

Every such special term may be held by the judge of the circuit court or, if he is dead or absent or is so situated in respect to any cause pending in the court as in his opinion to make it improper for him to try it, by such other circuit or city judge as may be selected or designated in the manner prescribed by law. The judge so selected or designated shall hold the special term and part of its session may be held by one judge and part of it by another. A judge selected or designated to hold a special term shall have all the powers and is authorized to discharge all the duties of the judge of such circuit court.

History.

Code 1919, § 5896, § 17-132; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-522.
Adjournment of special term.

A special term may be adjourned from time to time during intervals between the regular terms, as necessary, for the dispatch of the business of the court.

History.

Code 1919, § 5896, § 17-133; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-523.
Salaries of judges of circuit courts.

The judges of the circuit courts shall each receive such salary as shall be fixed from time to time in the general appropriation acts. Such salary shall be the total compensation for circuit court judges. However, any county or city which has, prior to March 1, 1976, maintained any program of supplemental retirement or insurance for the benefit of such judges, may continue the same in effect as to judges theretofore covered thereby. The whole of such salaries shall be paid out of the state treasury.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-43; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-33; 1972, c. 43; 1973, c. 544; 1974, c. 225; 1976, c. 667; 1978, c. 249; 1979, c. 83; 1998, c. 872.

Cross references.

For constitutional provisions, see Va. Const., Art. VI, § 9.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

11A M.J. Judges, § 10.

§ 17.1-524.
Repealed by Acts 2009, c. 592.